New York, session 2025-2026, S8800.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (J) of paragraph 31 of subsection (i) of 2 section 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by a chapter of the laws 3 of 2025 amending the insurance law relating to requiring rates paid for 4 rehabilitation and opioid treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules 5 published by the office of addiction services and supports, as proposed 6 in legislative bills numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read 7 as follows: 8 (J) (i) This [subparagraph] clause shall apply to facilities in this 9 state that are licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the 10 office of addiction services and supports for the provision of outpa- 11 tient, intensive outpatient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treat- 12 ment that are participating in the insurer's provider network. 13 Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment provided by such facili- 14 ties shall be at rates negotiated between the insurer and the partic- 15 ipating facility, provided that such rates are not less than the rates 16 that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance 17 program under title eleven of article five of the social services law. 18 For the purposes of this [subparagraph] clause, the rates that would be 19 paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under 20 title eleven of article five of the social services law [shall be set 21 forth in a fee schedule setting forth the specific fee for each individ- 22 ual service covered by this subparagraph published by the office of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11143-04-6 S. 8800 2 1 addiction services and supports by November first of the preceding 2 calendar year and] shall be the rates with an effective date of April 3 first of the preceding year, which shall be established prior to October 4 first of the preceding calendar year. 5 (ii) The office of addiction services and supports shall publish 6 information adequate to calculate the rates that would be paid for such 7 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 8 of article five of the social services law. Such information shall be 9 provided in a form and manner to be determined by the commissioner of 10 addiction services and supports. Nothing in this clause shall be 11 construed to relieve an insurer of the obligation to reimburse at no 12 less than the applicable minimum rate set forth in clause (i) of this 13 subparagraph. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings and appli- 14 cations, the superintendent shall provide insurers with guidance on 15 factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate changes for the 16 purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications to the 17 superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that the 18 rates with an effective date of April first differ from the estimated 19 rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, insurers 20 may account for such differences in future premium rate filings and 21 applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 22 § 2. Subparagraph (K) of paragraph 35 of subsection (i) of section 23 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 24 amending the insurance law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabil- 25 itation and opioid treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules 26 published by the office of addiction services and supports, as proposed 27 in legislative bills numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read 28 as follows: 29 (K) (i) This [subparagraph] clause shall apply to outpatient treatment 30 provided in a facility issued an operating certificate by the commis- 31 sioner of mental health pursuant to the provisions of article thirty-one 32 of the mental hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the office of 33 mental health, or in a crisis stabilization center licensed pursuant to 34 section 36.01 of the mental hygiene law, that is participating in the 35 insurer's provider network. Reimbursement for covered outpatient treat- 36 ment provided by such a facility shall be at rates negotiated between 37 the insurer and the participating facility, provided that such rates are 38 not less than the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant 39 to the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of 40 the social services law. For the purposes of this [subparagraph] clause, 41 the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical 42 assistance program under title eleven of article five of the social 43 services law [shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the 44 specific fee for each individual service covered by this subparagraph 45 published by the office of mental health by November first of the 46 preceding calendar year and] shall be the rates with an effective date 47 of April first of the preceding year, which shall be established prior 48 to October first of the preceding calendar year. 49 (ii) The office of mental health shall publish information adequate to 50 calculate the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 51 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 52 social services law. Such information shall be provided in a form and 53 manner to be determined by the commissioner of mental health. Nothing in 54 this clause shall be construed to relieve an insurer of the obligation 55 to reimburse at no less than the applicable minimum rate set forth in 56 clause (i) of this subparagraph. Prior to the submission of premium rate S. 8800 3 1 filings and applications, the superintendent shall provide insurers with 2 guidance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate chang- 3 es for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications 4 to the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 5 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 6 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 7 insurers may account for such differences in future premium rate filings 8 and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 9 § 3. Subparagraph (K) of paragraph 5 of subsection (l) of section 3221 10 of the insurance law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amend- 11 ing the insurance law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabili- 12 tation and opioid treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules 13 published by the office of addiction services and supports, as proposed 14 in legislative bills numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read 15 as follows: 16 (K) (i) This [subparagraph] clause shall apply to outpatient treatment 17 provided in a facility issued an operating certificate by the commis- 18 sioner of mental health pursuant to the provisions of article thirty-one 19 of the mental hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the office of 20 mental health, or in a crisis stabilization center licensed pursuant to 21 section 36.01 of the mental hygiene law, that is participating in the 22 insurer's provider network. Reimbursement for covered outpatient treat- 23 ment provided by such a facility shall be at rates negotiated between 24 the insurer and the participating facility, provided that such rates are 25 not less than the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant 26 to the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of 27 the social services law. For the purposes of this [subparagraph] clause, 28 the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical 29 assistance program under title eleven of article five of the social 30 services law [shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the 31 specific fee for each individual service covered by this subparagraph 32 published by the office of mental health by November first of the 33 preceding calendar year and] shall be the rates with an effective date 34 of April first of the preceding year, which shall be established prior 35 to October first of the preceding calendar year. 36 (ii) The office of mental health shall publish information adequate to 37 calculate the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 38 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 39 social services law. Such information shall be provided in a form and 40 manner to be determined by the commissioner of mental health. Nothing in 41 this clause shall be construed to relieve an insurer of the obligation 42 to reimburse at no less than the applicable minimum rate set forth in 43 clause (i) of this subparagraph. Prior to the submission of premium rate 44 filings and applications, the superintendent shall provide insurers with 45 guidance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate chang- 46 es for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications 47 to the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 48 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 49 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 50 insurers may account for such differences in future premium rate filings 51 and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 52 § 4. Subparagraph (J) of paragraph 7 of subsection (l) of section 3221 53 of the insurance law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amend- 54 ing the insurance law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabili- 55 tation and opioid treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules 56 published by the office of addiction services and supports, as proposed S. 8800 4 1 in legislative bills numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read 2 as follows: 3 (J) (i) This [subparagraph] clause shall apply to facilities in this 4 state that are licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the 5 office of addiction services and supports for the provision of outpa- 6 tient, intensive outpatient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treat- 7 ment that are participating in the insurer's provider network. 8 Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment provided by such facili- 9 ties shall be at rates negotiated between the insurer and the partic- 10 ipating facility, provided that such rates are not less than the rates 11 that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance 12 program under title eleven of article five of the social services law. 13 For the purposes of this [subparagraph] clause, the rates that would be 14 paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under 15 title eleven of article five of the social services law [shall be set 16 forth in a fee schedule setting forth the specific fee for each individ- 17 ual service covered by this subparagraph published by the office of 18 addiction services and supports by November first of the preceding 19 calendar year and] shall be the rates with an effective date of April 20 first of the preceding year, which shall be established prior to October 21 first of the preceding calendar year. 22 (ii) The office of addiction services and supports shall publish 23 information adequate to calculate the rates that would be paid for such 24 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 25 of article five of the social services law. Such information shall be 26 provided in a form and manner to be determined by the commissioner of 27 addiction services and supports. Nothing in this clause shall be 28 construed to relieve an insurer of the obligation to reimburse at no 29 less than the applicable minimum rate set forth in clause (i) of this 30 subparagraph. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings and appli- 31 cations, the superintendent shall provide insurers with guidance on 32 factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate changes for the 33 purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications to the 34 superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that the 35 rates with an effective date of April first differ from the estimated 36 rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, insurers 37 may account for such differences in future premium rate filings and 38 applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 39 § 5. Paragraph 12 of subsection (g) of section 4303 of the insurance 40 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance 41 law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabilitation and opioid 42 treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules published by the office 43 of addiction services and supports, as proposed in legislative bills 44 numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read as follows: 45 (12) (A) This [paragraph] subparagraph shall apply to outpatient 46 treatment provided in a facility issued an operating certificate by the 47 commissioner of mental health pursuant to the provisions of article 48 thirty-one of the mental hygiene law, or in a facility operated by the 49 office of mental health, or in a crisis stabilization center licensed 50 pursuant to section 36.01 of the mental hygiene law, that is participat- 51 ing in the corporation's provider network. Reimbursement for covered 52 outpatient treatment provided by such facility shall be at rates negoti- 53 ated between the corporation and the participating facility, provided 54 that such rates are not less than the rates that would be paid for such 55 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 56 of article five of the social services law. For the purposes of this S. 8800 5 1 [paragraph] subparagraph, the rates that would be paid for such treat- 2 ment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven of 3 article five of the social services law [shall be set forth in a fee 4 schedule setting forth the specific fee for each individual service 5 covered by this paragraph published by the office of mental health by 6 November first of the preceding calendar year and] shall be the rates 7 with an effective date of April first of the preceding year, which shall 8 be established prior to October first of the preceding calendar year. 9 (B) The office of mental health shall publish information adequate to 10 calculate the rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to 11 the medical assistance program under title eleven of article five of the 12 social services law. Such information shall be provided in a form and 13 manner to be determined by the commissioner of mental health. Nothing in 14 this subparagraph shall be construed to relieve an insurer of the obli- 15 gation to reimburse at no less than the applicable minimum rate set 16 forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. Prior to the submission of 17 premium rate filings and applications, the superintendent shall provide 18 corporations with guidance on factors to consider in calculating the 19 impact of rate changes for the purposes of submitting premium rate 20 filings and applications to the superintendent for the subsequent policy 21 year. To the extent that the rates with an effective date of April first 22 differ from the estimated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and 23 applications, corporations may account for such differences in future 24 premium rate filings and applications submitted to the superintendent 25 for approval. 26 § 6. Paragraph 10 of subsection (l) of section 4303 of the insurance 27 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance 28 law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabilitation and opioid 29 treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules published by the office 30 of addiction services and supports, as proposed in legislative bills 31 numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read as follows: 32 (10) (A) This [paragraph] subparagraph shall apply to facilities in 33 this state that are licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the 34 office of addiction services and supports for the provision of outpa- 35 tient, intensive outpatient, outpatient rehabilitation and opioid treat- 36 ment that are participating in the corporation's provider network. 37 Reimbursement for covered outpatient treatment provided by such facili- 38 ties shall be at rates negotiated between the corporation and the 39 participating facility, provided that such rates are not less than the 40 rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical 41 assistance program under title eleven of article five of the social 42 services law. For the purposes of this [paragraph] subparagraph, the 43 rates that would be paid for such treatment pursuant to the medical 44 assistance program under title eleven of article five of the social 45 services law [shall be set forth in a fee schedule setting forth the 46 specific fee for each individual service covered by this paragraph 47 published by the office of addiction services and supports by November 48 first of the preceding calendar year and] shall be the rates with an 49 effective date of April first of the preceding year, which shall be 50 established prior to October first of the preceding calendar year. 51 (B) The office of addiction services and supports shall publish infor- 52 mation adequate to calculate the rates that would be paid for such 53 treatment pursuant to the medical assistance program under title eleven 54 of article five of the social services law. Such information shall be 55 provided in a form and manner to be determined by the commissioner of 56 addiction services and supports. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be S. 8800 6 1 construed to relieve an insurer of the obligation to reimburse at no 2 less than the applicable minimum rate set forth in subparagraph (A) of 3 this paragraph. Prior to the submission of premium rate filings and 4 applications, the superintendent shall provide corporations with guid- 5 ance on factors to consider in calculating the impact of rate changes 6 for the purposes of submitting premium rate filings and applications to 7 the superintendent for the subsequent policy year. To the extent that 8 the rates with an effective date of April first differ from the esti- 9 mated rates incorporated in premium rate filings and applications, 10 corporations may account for such differences in future premium rate 11 filings and applications submitted to the superintendent for approval. 12 § 7. Section 7 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance 13 law relating to requiring rates paid for rehabilitation and opioid 14 treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules published by the office 15 of addiction services and supports, as proposed in legislative bills 16 numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately [and shall apply to all 18 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on 19 or after such date]. 20 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 21 sections one, two, three, four, five and six of this act shall take 22 effect on the same date and in the same manner as a chapter of the laws 23 of 2025 amending the insurance law relating to requiring rates paid for 24 rehabilitation and opioid treatment be pursuant to certain fee schedules 25 published by the office of addiction services and supports, as proposed 26 in legislative bills numbers S. 6897-A and A. 7038-A, takes effect.